Nevada, session 83, AB56.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 630.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.253 1. The Board shall, as a prerequisite for the:
(a) Renewal of a license as a physician assistant;
(b) Renewal of a license as an anesthesiologist assistant; or
(c) Biennial registration of the holder of a license to practice
medicine,
 require each holder to submit evidence of compliance with the
requirements for continuing education as set forth in regulations
adopted by the Board.
2. These requirements:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(a) May provide for the completion of one or more courses of
instruction relating to risk management in the performance of
medical services.
(b) [Must provide for the completion of a course of instruction,
within 2 years after initial licensure, relating to the medical
consequences of an act of terrorism that involves the use of a
weapon of mass destruction. The course must provide at least 4
hours of instruction that includes instruction in the following
subjects:
(1) An overview of acts of terrorism and weapons of mass
destruction;
(2) Personal protective equipment required for acts of
terrorism;
(3) Common symptoms and methods of treatment associated
with exposure to, or injuries caused by, chemical, biological,
radioactive and nuclear agents;
(4) Syndromic surveillance and reporting procedures for acts
of terrorism that involve biological agents; and
(5) An overview of the information available on, and the use
of, the Health Alert Network.
(c)] Must provide for the completion by a holder of a license to
practice medicine of a course of instruction within 2 years after
initial licensure that provides at least 2 hours of instruction on
evidence-based suicide prevention and awareness as described in
subsection [6.] 5.
[(d)] (c) Must provide for the completion of at least 2 hours of
training in the screening, brief intervention and referral to treatment
approach to substance use disorder within 2 years after initial
licensure.
[(e)] (d) Must provide for the biennial completion by each
psychiatrist and each physician assistant practicing under the
supervision of a psychiatrist of one or more courses of instruction
that provide at least 2 hours of instruction relating to cultural
competency and diversity, equity and inclusion. Such instruction:
(1) May include the training provided pursuant to NRS
449.103, where applicable.
(2) Must be based upon a range of research from diverse
sources.
(3) Must address persons of different cultural backgrounds,
including, without limitation:
(I) Persons from various gender, racial and ethnic
backgrounds;
(II) Persons from various religious backgrounds;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(III) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and questioning
persons;
(IV) Children and senior citizens;
(V) Veterans;
(VI) Persons with a mental illness;
(VII) Persons with an intellectual disability,
developmental disability or physical disability; and
(VIII) Persons who are part of any other population that a
psychiatrist or a physician assistant practicing under the supervision
of a psychiatrist may need to better understand, as determined by the
Board.
[(f)] (e) Must allow the holder of a license to receive credit
toward the total amount of continuing education required by the
Board for the completion of a course of instruction relating to
genetic counseling and genetic testing.
[(g)] (f) Must provide for the completion by a physician or
physician assistant who provides or supervises the provision of
emergency medical services in a hospital or primary care of at least
2 hours of training in the stigma, discrimination and unrecognized
bias toward persons who have acquired or are at a high risk of
acquiring human immunodeficiency virus within 2 years after
beginning to provide or supervise the provision of such services or
care.
3. [The Board may determine whether to include in a program
of continuing education courses of instruction relating to the
medical consequences of an act of terrorism that involves the use of
a weapon of mass destruction in addition to the course of instruction
required by paragraph (b) of subsection 2.
4.] The Board shall encourage each holder of a license who
treats or cares for persons who are more than 60 years of age to
receive, as a portion of their continuing education, education in
geriatrics and gerontology, including such topics as:
(a) The skills and knowledge that the licensee needs to address
aging issues;
(b) Approaches to providing health care to older persons,
including both didactic and clinical approaches;
(c) The biological, behavioral, social and emotional aspects of
the aging process; and
(d) The importance of maintenance of function and
independence for older persons.
[5.] 4. The Board shall encourage each holder of a license to
practice medicine to receive, as a portion of his or her continuing
education, training concerning methods for educating patients about
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
how to effectively manage medications, including, without
limitation, the ability of the patient to request to have the symptom
or purpose for which a drug is prescribed included on the label
attached to the container of the drug.
[6.] 5. The Board shall require each holder of a license to
practice medicine to receive as a portion of his or her continuing
education at least 2 hours of instruction every 4 years on evidence-
based suicide prevention and awareness, which may include,
without limitation, instruction concerning:
(a) The skills and knowledge that the licensee needs to detect
behaviors that may lead to suicide, including, without limitation,
post-traumatic stress disorder;
(b) Approaches to engaging other professionals in suicide
intervention; and
(c) The detection of suicidal thoughts and ideations and the
prevention of suicide.
[7. ] 6. The Board shall encourage each holder of a license to
practice medicine or as a physician assistant to receive, as a portion
of his or her continuing education, training and education in the
diagnosis of rare diseases, including, without limitation:
(a) Recognizing the symptoms of pediatric cancer; and
(b) Interpreting family history to determine whether such
symptoms indicate a normal childhood illness or a condition that
requires additional examination.
[8.] 7. A holder of a license to practice medicine may not
substitute the continuing education credits relating to suicide
prevention and awareness required by this section for the purposes
of satisfying an equivalent requirement for continuing education in
ethics.
[9.] 8. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.2535, a
holder of a license to practice medicine may substitute not more
than 2 hours of continuing education credits in pain management,
care for persons with an addictive disorder or the screening, brief
intervention and referral to treatment approach to substance use
disorder for the purposes of satisfying an equivalent requirement for
continuing education in ethics.
[10.] 9. As used in this section [:
(a) “Act of terrorism” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4415.
(b) “Biological agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.442.
(c) “Chemical agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4425.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(d) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(e) “Radioactive agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4437.
(f) “Weapon of mass destruction” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 202.4445.]
Sec. 2. NRS 630.255 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.255 1. Any licensee who changes the location of his or
her practice of medicine from this State to another state or country,
has never engaged in the practice of medicine in this State after
licensure or has ceased to engage in the practice of medicine in this
State for 12 consecutive months may be placed on inactive status by
order of the Board. Any physician assistant who notifies the Board
of his or her desire to be placed on inactive status in writing on a
form prescribed by the Board may be placed on inactive status by
order of the Board.
2. Each inactive licensee shall maintain a permanent mailing
address with the Board to which all communications from the Board
to the licensee must be sent. An inactive licensee who changes his or
her permanent mailing address shall notify the Board in writing of
the new permanent mailing address within 30 days after the change.
If an inactive licensee fails to notify the Board in writing of a
change in his or her permanent mailing address within 30 days after
the change, the Board may impose upon the licensee a fine not to
exceed $250.
3. In addition to the requirements of subsection 2, any licensee
who changes the location of his or her practice of medicine from
this State to another state or country shall maintain an electronic
mail address with the Board to which all communications from the
Board to him or her may be sent.
4. An inactive physician assistant shall not practice as a
physician assistant. The Board shall consider an inactive physician
assistant who practices as a physician assistant to be practicing
without a license. Such practice constitutes grounds for disciplinary
action against the physician assistant in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 630.275.
5. [The Board shall exempt an inactive physician assistant from
paying the applicable fee for biennial registration prescribed by
NRS 630.268.
6.] Before resuming the practice of medicine or practice as a
physician assistant in this State, the inactive licensee must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(a) Notify the Board in writing of his or her intent to resume the
practice of medicine or practice as a physician assistant, as
applicable, in this State;
(b) File an affidavit with the Board describing the activities of
the licensee during the period of inactive status;
(c) Complete the form for registration for active status;
(d) Pay the applicable fee for biennial registration; and
(e) Satisfy the Board of his or her competence to practice
medicine or practice as a physician assistant, as applicable.
[7.] 6. If the Board determines that the conduct or competence
of the licensee during the period of inactive status would have
warranted denial of an application for a license to practice medicine
or practice as a physician assistant in this State, the Board may
refuse to place the licensee on active status.
Sec. 3. NRS 630.268 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.268 1. The Board shall charge and collect not more than
the following fees:
For application for and issuance of a license to
practice as a physician, including a license as an
administrative physician or a license by
endorsement ..................................................... [$600] $800
For application for and issuance of a temporary,
locum tenens, limited, restricted, authorized
facility, special, special purpose or special event
license ................................................................... [400] 600
For renewal of a limited, restricted, authorized
facility or special license ...................................... [400] 600
For application for and issuance of a license as a
physician assistant, including a license by
endorsement and any temporary license ............. [400] 600
For application for and issuance of a simultaneous
license as a physician assistant ...................................... 200
For biennial registration of a physician assistant................ 800
For biennial simultaneous registration of a
physician assistant ......................................................... 400
For biennial registration of a physician .................. [800] 1,000
For application for and issuance of a license as a
perfusionist or practitioner of respiratory care
including any temporary license to practice
perfusion and any temporary license to provide
respiratory care as an intern ............................... [400] 600
For biennial renewal of a license as a perfusionist ............. 600
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
For application for and issuance of a license or
temporary license to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant .................................. [$400] $600
For application for and initial issuance of a
simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist
assistant ................................................................ [200] 400
For biennial registration of an anesthesiologist
assistant ......................................................................... 800
For biennial simultaneous registration of an
anesthesiologist assistant ............................................... 400
For biennial registration of a practitioner of
respiratory care .............................................................. 600
For biennial registration for a physician who is on
inactive status ................................................................ 600
For biennial registration for a physician assistant
who is on inactive status ............................................... 400
For written verification of licensure ............................ [50] 100
[For a duplicate identification card ...................................... 25]
For a duplicate [license] wall certificate ..................... [50] 100
[For computer printouts or labels ....................................... 500
For verification of a listing of physicians, per hour ............ 20]
For furnishing a custom list of [new physicians]
licensees or a list of newly licensed licensees .............. 100
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, in
addition to the fees prescribed in subsection 1, the Board shall
charge and collect necessary and reasonable fees for the expedited
processing of a request or for any other incidental service the Board
provides.
3. The cost of any special meeting called at the request of a
licensee, an institution, an organization, a state agency or an
applicant for licensure must be paid for by the person or entity
requesting the special meeting. Such a special meeting must not be
called until the person or entity requesting it has paid a cash deposit
with the Board sufficient to defray all expenses of the meeting.
4. If an applicant submits an application for a license by
endorsement pursuant to:
(a) NRS 630.1607, and the applicant is an active member of, or
the spouse of an active member of, the Armed Forces of the United
States, a veteran or the surviving spouse of a veteran, the Board
shall collect not more than one-half of the fee set forth in subsection
1 for the initial issuance of the license. As used in this paragraph,
“veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.005.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(b) NRS 630.2752, the Board shall collect not more than one-
half of the fee set forth in subsection 1 for the initial issuance of the
license.
5. If an applicant submits an application for a license by
endorsement pursuant to NRS 630.1606 or 630.2751, as applicable,
the Board shall charge and collect not more than the fee specified in
subsection 1 for the application for and initial issuance of a license.
6. The amount of the fee specified in subsection 1 for the
biennial registration of a physician assistant who is on inactive
status must not exceed one-half of the amount of the fee for the
biennial registration of a physician assistant who is on active
status.
Sec. 4. NRS 630.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.275 The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
licensure of a physician assistant, including, but not limited to:
1. The educational and other qualifications of applicants.
2. The required academic program for applicants.
3. The procedures for applications for and the issuance of
licenses.
4. The procedures deemed necessary by the Board for
applications for and the initial issuance of licenses by endorsement
pursuant to NRS 630.2751 or 630.2752.
5. The tests or examinations of applicants required by the
Board.
6. The medical services which a physician assistant may
perform, except that a physician assistant may not perform those
specific functions and duties delegated or restricted by law to
persons licensed as dentists, chiropractic physicians, naprapaths,
podiatric physicians and optometrists under chapters 631, 634,
634B, 635 and 636, respectively, of NRS, or as hearing aid
specialists.
7. The duration, renewal and termination of licenses, including
licenses by endorsement. The Board [shall] :
(a) Shall not require a physician assistant to receive or maintain
certification by the National Commission on Certification of
Physician Assistants, or its successor organization, or by any other
nationally recognized organization for the accreditation of physician
assistants to satisfy any continuing education requirements for the
renewal of licenses.
(b) Shall require a physician assistant who is on inactive status
to pay a biennial fee for registration prescribed by NRS 630.268.
8. The grounds and procedures respecting disciplinary actions
against physician assistants.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
9. The supervision of medical services of a physician assistant
by a supervising physician.
10. A physician assistant’s use of equipment that transfers
information concerning the medical condition of a patient in this
State electronically, telephonically or by fiber optics, including,
without limitation, through telehealth, from within or outside this
State or the United States.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. NRS 630.336 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.336 1. Any deliberations conducted or vote taken by the
Board or any investigative committee of the Board regarding its
ordering of a physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care to
undergo a physical or mental examination or any other examination
designated to assist the Board or committee in determining the
fitness of a physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care are not
subject to the requirements of NRS 241.020.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or 4, all
applications for a license to practice medicine, perfusion or
respiratory care, any charges filed by the Board, financial records of
the Board, formal hearings on any charges heard by the Board or a
panel selected by the Board, records of such hearings and any order
or decision of the Board or panel must be open to the public.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
239.0115, the following may be kept confidential:
(a) Any statement, evidence, credential or other proof submitted
in support of or to verify the contents of an application;
(b) Any report concerning the fitness of any person to receive or
hold a license to practice medicine, perfusion or respiratory care;
and
(c) Any communication between:
(1) The Board and any of its committees or panels; and
(2) The Board or its staff, investigators, experts, committees,
panels, hearing officers, advisory members or consultants and
counsel for the Board.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
239.0115, a complaint filed with the Board pursuant to NRS
630.307, all documents and other information filed with the
complaint and all documents and other information compiled as a
result of an investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate
disciplinary action are confidential.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
5. The formal complaint or other document filed by the Board
to initiate disciplinary action and all documents and information
considered by the Board when determining whether to impose
discipline are public records.
6. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or agency or any agency which is
investigating a person, including a law enforcement agency. Such
cooperation may include, without limitation, providing the board or
agency with minutes of a closed meeting, transcripts of oral
examinations and the results of oral examinations.
7. If authorized by a licensee, the Board shall provide to an
employer of the licensee or an entity credentialing the licensee
copies of any documents and other information obtained by the
Board during the application process for the issuance of the
license of the licensee, including, without limitation, copies of any
documents and other information verifying:
(a) The completion by the licensee of any educational program
related to licensure, including, without limitation, academic
transcripts.
(b) The completion by the licensee of any postgraduate
training.
(c) Any malpractice insurance maintained by the licensee.
(d) Any privileges of the licensee to practice at a hospital,
clinic or other medical facility.
Sec. 6.3. Chapter 633 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Obtaining, maintaining or renewing or attempting to obtain,
maintain or renew a license to practice osteopathic medicine by
bribery, fraud or misrepresentation or by any false, misleading,
inaccurate or incomplete statement constitutes grounds for the
Board to initiate disciplinary action against a licensee pursuant to
NRS 633.511 and to deny licensure to an applicant.
Sec. 6.7. NRS 633.311 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.311 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 633.315
and 633.381 to 633.419, inclusive, an applicant for a license to
practice osteopathic medicine may be issued a license by the Board
if:
(a) The applicant is 21 years of age or older;
(b) The applicant is a graduate of a school of osteopathic
medicine;
(c) The applicant:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(1) Has graduated from a school of osteopathic medicine
before 1995 and has completed:
(I) A hospital internship; or
(II) One year of postgraduate training that complies with
the standards of intern training established by the American
Osteopathic Association;
(2) Has completed 3 years, or such other length of time as
required by a specific program, of postgraduate medical education
as a resident in the United States or Canada in a program approved
by the Board, the Bureau of Professional Education of the American
Osteopathic Association or the Accreditation Council for Graduate
Medical Education; or
(3) Is a resident who is enrolled in a postgraduate training
program in [this State,] the United States or Canada that is
approved by the Board, the Bureau of Professional Education of
the American Osteopathic Association, the Accreditation Council
for Graduate Medical Education or, as applicable, their successor
organizations, has completed 24 months of the program and has
committed, in writing, that he or she will complete the program;
(d) The applicant applies for the license as provided by law;
(e) The applicant passes:
(1) All parts of the licensing examination of the National
Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners;
(2) All parts of the licensing examination of the Federation
of State Medical Boards;
(3) All parts of the licensing examination of the Board, a
state, territory or possession of the United States, or the District of
Columbia, and is certified by a specialty board of the American
Osteopathic Association or by the American Board of Medical
Specialties; or
(4) A combination of the parts of the licensing examinations
specified in subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3) that is approved by the
Board;
(f) The applicant pays the fees provided for in this chapter; and
(g) The applicant submits all information required to complete
an application for a license.
2. An applicant for a license to practice osteopathic medicine
may satisfy the requirements for postgraduate education or training
prescribed by paragraph (c) of subsection 1:
(a) In one or more approved postgraduate programs, which may
be conducted at one or more facilities in this State or, except for a
resident who is enrolled in a postgraduate training program in this
State pursuant to subparagraph (3) of paragraph (c) of subsection 1,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
in the District of Columbia or another state or territory of the United
States;
(b) In one or more approved specialties or disciplines;
(c) In nonconsecutive months; and
(d) At any time before receiving his or her license.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the
contrary, if, after issuing a license to practice osteopathic
medicine, the Board obtains information from a primary or other
source of information and that information differs from the
information provided by the applicant or otherwise received by the
Board, the Board may:
(a) Temporarily suspend the license;
(b) Promptly review the differing information with the Board
as a whole or in a committee appointed by the Board;
(c) Declare the license void if the Board or a committee
appointed by the Board determines that the information submitted
by the applicant was false, fraudulent or intended to deceive the
Board;
(d) Refer the applicant to the Attorney General for possible
criminal prosecution pursuant to NRS 633.741; or
(e) If the Board temporarily suspends the license, allow the
license to return to active status subject to any terms and
conditions specified by the Board, including:
(1) Placing the licensee on probation for a specified period
with specified conditions;
(2) Administering a public reprimand;
(3) Limiting the practice of the licensee;
(4) Suspending the license for a specified period or until
further order of the Board;
(5) Requiring the licensee to participate in a program to
correct an alcohol or other substance use disorder;
(6) Requiring supervision of the practice of the licensee;
(7) Imposing an administrative fine not to exceed $5,000;
(8) Requiring the licensee to perform community service
without compensation;
(9) Requiring the licensee to take a physical or mental
examination or an examination testing his or her competence to
practice osteopathic medicine;
(10) Requiring the licensee to complete any training or
educational requirements specified by the Board; and
(11) Requiring the licensee to submit a corrected
application, including the payment of all appropriate fees and
costs incident to submitting an application.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
4. If the Board determines after reviewing the differing
information to allow the licensee to remain in active status, the
action of the Board is not a disciplinary action and must not be
reported to any national database. If the Board determines after
reviewing the differing information to declare the license void, its
action shall be deemed a disciplinary action and shall be
reportable to national databases.
Sec. 7. NRS 633.4254 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4254 1. The Board may issue a license to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant to an applicant who:
(a) Graduated from an anesthesiologist assistant program
accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health
Education Programs or its predecessor or successor organization;
(b) Has passed a certification examination administered by the
National Commission for Certification of Anesthesiologist
Assistants, its successor organization or other nationally recognized
organization for the certification of anesthesiologist assistants that
has been reviewed and approved by the Board;
(c) Is certified by the National Commission for Certification of
Anesthesiologist Assistants, its successor organization or other
nationally recognized organization for the certification of
anesthesiologist assistants that has been reviewed and approved by
the Board;
(d) Submits an application for a license as an anesthesiologist
assistant in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 633.4252;
(e) Pays the application fee for the application for and issuance
of a license as an anesthesiologist assistant required by NRS
633.501; and
(f) Meets the qualifications prescribed by the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 633.4252 to assist in the
practice of medicine under the supervision of a supervising
osteopathic anesthesiologist.
2. An applicant for a license to practice as an anesthesiologist
assistant submitted pursuant to this section must include, without
limitation, all the information required by the Board to complete the
application.
3. A license issued by the Board pursuant to subsection 1 [is
valid for a period of 2 years and] may be renewed on or before
December 31 of each odd-numbered year in a manner consistent
with the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to
NRS 633.4252.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
Sec. 8. NRS 633.426 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.426 If a person licensed as an anesthesiologist assistant
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is not applying to renew
his or her license and wishes to hold a simultaneous license as an
anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630
of NRS, the person must:
1. Apply for an anesthesiologist assistant license to the Board
of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS; and
2. Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
(a) The [fee for] biennial simultaneous [registration of] license
renewal fee for an anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to NRS
633.501; and
(b) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for an
anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to NRS 630.268.
Sec. 9. NRS 633.433 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.433 1. The Board may issue a license as a physician
assistant to an applicant who is qualified under the regulations of the
Board to perform medical services under the supervision of a
supervising osteopathic physician. The application for a license as a
physician assistant must include all information required to
complete the application.
2. A license as a physician assistant issued by the Board may
be renewed on or before December 31 of each odd-numbered year
in a manner consistent with the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 633.434.
Sec. 10. NRS 633.434 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.434 The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
licensure of a physician assistant, including, without limitation:
1. The educational and other qualifications of applicants.
2. The required academic program for applicants.
3. The procedures for applications for and the issuance and
renewal of licenses.
4. The procedures deemed necessary by the Board for
applications for and the issuance of initial licenses by endorsement
pursuant to NRS 633.4335 and 633.4336.
5. The tests or examinations of applicants by the Board.
6. The medical services which a physician assistant may
perform, except that a physician assistant may not perform
osteopathic manipulative therapy or those specific functions and
duties delegated or restricted by law to persons licensed as dentists,
chiropractic physicians, doctors of Oriental medicine, naprapaths,
podiatric physicians, optometrists and hearing aid specialists under
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
chapters 631, 634, 634A, 634B, 635, 636 and 637B, respectively, of
NRS.
7. The grounds and procedures respecting disciplinary actions
against physician assistants.
8. The supervision of medical services of a physician assistant
by a supervising osteopathic physician.
Sec. 11. NRS 633.438 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.438 If a person licensed to practice as a physician assistant
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is not applying to renew
his or her license and wishes to hold a simultaneous license to
practice as a physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 630 of NRS, the person must:
1. Apply for a license to practice as a physician assistant to the
Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS; and
2. Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
(a) The [annual] biennial simultaneous [registration] license
renewal fee for a physician assistant pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(b) The fee for application for and issuance of a simultaneous
license as a physician assistant pursuant to NRS 630.268.
Sec. 12. NRS 633.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.471 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 15
and NRS 633.491, every holder of a license, except a physician
assistant or an anesthesiologist assistant, issued under this chapter,
except a temporary , [or a] special or authorized facility license,
may renew the license on or before [January 1] December 31 of
each [calendar] even-numbered year after its issuance by:
(a) Applying for renewal on forms provided by the Board;
(b) Paying the [annual] biennial license renewal fee specified in
this chapter;
(c) Submitting a list of all actions filed or claims submitted to
arbitration or mediation for malpractice or negligence against the
holder during the previous [year;] biennium;
(d) Subject to subsection 14, submitting evidence to the Board
that in the [year] biennium preceding the application for renewal the
holder has attended courses or programs of continuing education
approved by the Board in accordance with regulations adopted by
the Board totaling a number of hours established by the Board
which must not be less than [35] 40 hours nor more than that set in
the requirements for continuing medical education of the American
Osteopathic Association; and
(e) Submitting all information required to complete the renewal.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
2. The Secretary of the Board shall notify each licensee of the
requirements for renewal not less than 30 days before the date of
renewal.
3. The Board shall request submission of verified evidence of
completion of the required number of hours of continuing medical
education [annually] biennially from a percentage of the applicants
for renewal of a license to practice osteopathic medicine or a license
to practice as a physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant
determined by the Board. Subject to subsection 14, upon a request
from the Board, an applicant for renewal of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine or a license to practice as a physician assistant
or anesthesiologist assistant shall submit verified evidence
satisfactory to the Board that in the [year] biennium preceding the
application for renewal the applicant attended courses or programs
of continuing medical education approved by the Board totaling the
number of hours established by the Board.
4. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine to complete a course of instruction within 2
years after initial licensure that provides at least 2 hours of
instruction on evidence-based suicide prevention and awareness as
described in subsection 9.
5. The Board shall encourage each holder of a license to
practice osteopathic medicine to receive, as a portion of his or her
continuing education, training concerning methods for educating
patients about how to effectively manage medications, including,
without limitation, the ability of the patient to request to have the
symptom or purpose for which a drug is prescribed included on the
label attached to the container of the drug.
6. The Board shall encourage each holder of a license to
practice osteopathic medicine or as a physician assistant to receive,
as a portion of his or her continuing education, training and
education in the diagnosis of rare diseases, including, without
limitation:
(a) Recognizing the symptoms of pediatric cancer; and
(b) Interpreting family history to determine whether such
symptoms indicate a normal childhood illness or a condition that
requires additional examination.
7. The Board shall require, as part of the continuing education
requirements approved by the Board, the biennial completion by a
holder of a license to practice osteopathic medicine of at least 2
hours of continuing education credits in ethics, pain management,
care of persons with addictive disorders or the screening, brief
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
intervention and referral to treatment approach to substance use
disorder.
8. The continuing education requirements approved by the
Board must allow the holder of a license as an osteopathic
physician, physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant to receive
credit toward the total amount of continuing education required by
the Board for the completion of a course of instruction relating to
genetic counseling and genetic testing.
9. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine to receive as a portion of his or her continuing
education at least 2 hours of instruction every 4 years on evidence-
based suicide prevention and awareness which may include, without
limitation, instruction concerning:
(a) The skills and knowledge that the licensee needs to detect
behaviors that may lead to suicide, including, without limitation,
post-traumatic stress disorder;
(b) Approaches to engaging other professionals in suicide
intervention; and
(c) The detection of suicidal thoughts and ideations and the
prevention of suicide.
10. A holder of a license to practice osteopathic medicine may
not substitute the continuing education credits relating to suicide
prevention and awareness required by this section for the purposes
of satisfying an equivalent requirement for continuing education in
ethics.
11. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine to complete at least 2 hours of training in the
screening, brief intervention and referral to treatment approach to
substance use disorder within 2 years after initial licensure.
12. The Board shall require each psychiatrist or a physician
assistant practicing under the supervision of a psychiatrist to
biennially complete one or more courses of instruction that provide
at least 2 hours of instruction relating to cultural competency and
diversity, equity and inclusion. Such instruction:
(a) May include the training provided pursuant to NRS 449.103,
where applicable.
(b) Must be based upon a range of research from diverse
sources.
(c) Must address persons of different cultural backgrounds,
including, without limitation:
(1) Persons from various gender, racial and ethnic
backgrounds;
(2) Persons from various religious backgrounds;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(3) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and questioning
persons;
(4) Children and senior citizens;
(5) Veterans;
(6) Persons with a mental illness;
(7) Persons with an intellectual disability, developmental
disability or physical disability; and
(8) Persons who are part of any other population that a
psychiatrist or physician assistant practicing under the supervision
of a psychiatrist may need to better understand, as determined by the
Board.
13. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine or as a physician assistant who provides or
supervises the provision of emergency medical services in a hospital
or primary care to complete at least 2 hours of training in the stigma,
discrimination and unrecognized bias toward persons who have
acquired or are at a high risk of acquiring human immunodeficiency
virus within 2 years after beginning to provide or supervise the
provision of such services or care.
14. The Board shall not require a physician assistant to receive
or maintain certification by the National Commission on
Certification of Physician Assistants, or its successor organization,
or by any other nationally recognized organization for the
accreditation of physician assistants to satisfy any continuing
education requirement pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 and
subsection 3.
15. Members of the Armed Forces of the United States and the
United States Public Health Service are exempt from payment of the
[annual] biennial license renewal fee during their active duty status.
16. As used in this section, “primary care” means the practice
of family medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and
gynecology and midwifery.
Sec. 13. NRS 633.4715 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4715 1. The Board shall:
(a) Require each applicant for the renewal of a license as an
osteopathic physician or physician assistant to:
(1) Report whether he or she has received training in the
treatment of mental and emotional trauma immediately following an
emergency or disaster, training in the short-term treatment of mental
and emotional trauma or training in the long-term treatment of
mental and emotional trauma; and
(2) If the applicant has received training in the treatment of
mental and emotional trauma immediately following an emergency
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
or disaster, describe the training and indicate if he or she is willing
to respond immediately should an emergency or disaster arise at any
location in this State;
(b) Maintain a list of each licensed osteopathic physician and
physician assistant and any training described in subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (a) that the licensee has received and update the list at
least [annually] biennially to include information reported pursuant
to paragraph (a) by licensees who renewed their license during the
immediately preceding [year;] biennium;
(c) Maintain a list of the names and contact information for
osteopathic physicians or physician assistants who indicate that they
are willing to respond immediately should an emergency or disaster
arise at any location in this State and whom the Board has
determined have appropriate training to respond following an
emergency or disaster; and
(d) Provide the lists maintained pursuant to paragraphs (b) and
(c) upon request to a governmental entity responding to a state of
emergency or declaration of a disaster by the Governor or the
Legislature pursuant to NRS 414.070.
2. The Board shall not deny the renewal of a license as an
osteopathic physician or physician assistant solely because the
applicant has failed to comply with the requirements of paragraph
(a) of subsection 1.
3. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of subsection
1, any information obtained or maintained by the Board pursuant to
this section is confidential.
Sec. 14. NRS 633.4717 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4717 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, each
applicant for the renewal of any type of license as an osteopathic
physician pursuant to this chapter shall complete the data request
developed by the Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to NRS 439A.124. The applicant shall provide to the
Department all the information included in the request.
2. The Board shall make the data request described in
subsection 1 available to applicants for the renewal of a license as
an osteopathic physician on an electronic application for the renewal
of a license or through a link included on the Internet website
maintained by the Board.
3. An applicant for biennial [registration or] renewal of a
license who refuses or fails to complete a data request pursuant to
subsection 1 is not subject to disciplinary action, including, without
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
limitation, refusal to [issue the biennial registration or] renew the
license, for such refusal or failure.
4. The information contained in a completed data request is
confidential and, except as required by NRS 439A.124, must not be
disclosed to any person or entity.
Sec. 15. NRS 633.4718 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4718 A person applying to renew a license to practice as a
physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter who
wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS must:
1. Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold a
simultaneous license to practice as a physician assistant pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS;
2. Apply:
(a) To renew a license to practice as a physician assistant to the
Board pursuant to this chapter; and
(b) For a license to practice as a physician assistant to the Board
of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS; and
3. Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
(a) The [annual] biennial simultaneous [registration] license
renewal fee for a physician assistant pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(b) The fee for application for and issuance of a simultaneous
license as a physician assistant pursuant to NRS 630.268.
Sec. 16. NRS 633.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.481 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if a
licensee fails to comply with the requirements of NRS 633.471
within 10 days after the renewal date, the Board shall give 15 days’
notice of the failure to renew the license and of the expiration of the
license by certified mail to the licensee at the licensee’s last known
address that is registered with the Board. If the license is not
renewed within 15 days after receiving notice, the license expires
automatically without any further notice or a hearing and the Board
shall file a copy of the notice with the Drug Enforcement
Administration of the United States Department of Justice or its
successor agency.
2. A licensee who fails to meet the continuing education
requirements for license renewal may apply to the Board for a
waiver of the requirements. The Board may grant a waiver for that
[year] biennium only if the Board finds that the failure is due to a
disability, military service, absence from the United States, or
circumstances beyond the control of the licensee which are deemed
by the Board to excuse the failure.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
3. A person whose license has expired under this section may
apply to the Board for restoration of the license upon:
(a) Payment of all past due renewal fees and the late payment
fee specified in NRS 633.501;
(b) Producing verified evidence satisfactory to the Board of
completion of the total number of hours of continuing education
required for the [year] biennium preceding the renewal date and for
each [year] biennium succeeding the date of expiration;
(c) Stating under oath in writing that he or she has not withheld
information from the Board which if disclosed would constitute
grounds for disciplinary action under this chapter; and
(d) Submitting any other information that is required by the
Board to restore the license.
Sec. 17. NRS 633.491 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.491 1. A licensee who retires from practice is not
required [annually] biennially to renew his or her license after filing
with the Board an affidavit stating the date on which he or she
retired from practice and any other evidence that the Board may
require to verify the retirement.
2. An osteopathic physician or physician assistant who retires
from practice and who desires to return to practice may apply to
renew his or her license by paying all back [annual] biennial license
renewal fees [or annual registration fees] from the date of retirement
and submitting verified evidence satisfactory to the Board that the
licensee has attended continuing education courses or programs
approved by the Board which total:
(a) Twenty-five hours if the licensee has been retired 1 year or
less.
(b) Fifty hours within 12 months of the date of the application if
the licensee has been retired for more than 1 year.
3. A licensee who wishes to have a license placed on inactive
status must provide the Board with an affidavit stating the date on
which the licensee will cease the practice of osteopathic medicine or
cease to practice as a physician assistant in Nevada and any other
evidence that the Board may require. The Board shall place the
license of the licensee on inactive status upon receipt of:
(a) The affidavit required pursuant to this subsection; and
(b) Payment of the inactive license fee prescribed by
NRS 633.501.
4. An osteopathic physician or physician assistant whose
license has been placed on inactive status:
(a) Is not required to [annually] biennially renew the license.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, shall
[annually] biennially pay the inactive license fee prescribed by
NRS 633.501.
(c) Shall not practice osteopathic medicine or practice as a
physician assistant in this State.
5. A physician assistant whose license has been placed on
inactive status shall not practice as a physician assistant. The Board
shall consider a physician assistant whose license has been placed
on inactive status and who practices as a physician assistant to be
practicing without a license. Such practice constitutes grounds for
disciplinary action against the physician assistant in accordance with
the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 633.434.
6. The Board shall exempt a physician assistant whose license
has been placed on inactive status from paying the inactive license
fee prescribed by NRS 633.501.
7. An osteopathic physician or physician assistant whose
license is on inactive status and who wishes to renew his or her
license to practice osteopathic medicine or license to practice as a
physician assistant must:
(a) Provide to the Board verified evidence satisfactory to the
Board of completion of the total number of hours of continuing
medical education required for:
(1) The [year] biennium preceding the date of the application
for renewal of the license; and
(2) Each [year] biennium after the date the license was
placed on inactive status.
(b) Provide to the Board an affidavit stating that the applicant
has not withheld from the Board any information which would
constitute grounds for disciplinary action pursuant to this chapter.
(c) Comply with all other requirements for renewal.
Sec. 18. NRS 633.501 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.501 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
Board shall charge and collect fees not to exceed the following
amounts:
(a) Application and initial license fee for an
osteopathic physician .................................................... [$800] $1,600
(b) [Annual] Biennial license renewal fee for an
osteopathic physician ........................................................ [500] 1,000
(c) Temporary license fee ....................................................... 500
(d) Special or authorized facility license fee .......................... 200
(e) Special event license fee ................................................... 200
(f) Special or authorized facility license
renewal fee .................................................................................... 200
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(g) Reexamination fee .......................................................... $200
(h) Late payment fee ............................................................... 300
(i) Application and initial license fee for a
physician assistant ................................................................ [400] 800
(j) Application and initial simultaneous license
fee for a physician assistant ................................................. [200] 400
(k) [Annual registration] Biennial license
renewal fee for a physician assistant ................................... [400] 800
(l) [Annual] Biennial simultaneous [registration]
license renewal fee for a physician assistant ....................... [200] 400
(m) Inactive license fee .................................................. [200] 400
(n) Application and initial license fee for an
anesthesiologist assistant .............................................................. 400
(o) Application and initial simultaneous license
fee for an anesthesiologist assistant .............................................. 200
(p) Biennial license renewal fee for an
anesthesiologist assistant ............................................................. 400
(q) Biennial simultaneous license renewal fee
for an anesthesiologist assistant .................................................. 200
2. The Board may prorate the initial license fee for a new
license issued pursuant to paragraph (a) , [or] (i) or (n) of subsection
1 which expires less than [6] 12 months after the date of issuance.
3. The cost of any special meeting called at the request of a
licensee, an institution, an organization, a state agency or an
applicant for licensure must be paid by the person or entity
requesting the special meeting. Such a special meeting must not be
called until the person or entity requesting the meeting has paid a
cash deposit with the Board sufficient to defray all expenses of the
meeting.
4. If an applicant submits an application for a license by
endorsement pursuant to:
(a) NRS 633.399 or 633.400 and is an active member of, or the
spouse of an active member of, the Armed Forces of the United
States, a veteran or the surviving spouse of a veteran, the Board
shall collect not more than one-half of the fee set forth in subsection
1 for the initial issuance of the license. As used in this paragraph,
“veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.005.
(b) NRS 633.4336, the Board shall collect not more than one-
half of the fee set forth in subsection 1 for the initial issuance of the
license.
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of this
act:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
1. The renewal date of a license issued by the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine pursuant to the provisions of chapter 633 of
NRS, as those provisions existed before January 1, 2026, except a
license as a physician assistant, a license as an anesthesiologist
assistant, a temporary license or a special license, and which is held
by a person on December 31, 2025, remains January 1, 2026. Such a
license may be renewed in accordance with the applicable
provisions of chapter 633 of NRS, as those provisions existed before
January 1, 2026, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
Thereafter, a licensee who wishes to renew such a license must
renew the license in accordance with the applicable provisions of
chapter 633 of NRS, as amended by this act, and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
2. The renewal date of a license as a physician assistant or
anesthesiologist assistant issued by the State Board of Osteopathic
Medicine which is held by a licensee on December 31, 2025,
remains the date set forth on the license. Such a license may be
renewed in accordance with the applicable provisions of chapter 633
of NRS, as amended by this act, and the regulations adopted
pursuant thereto. The Board shall prorate the biennial fee to renew
the license for such a renewal.
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 22. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 21, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)